Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201276-3419
Certain contracts; requirements.

A contract
to make a transfer on death deed, or not to revoke a transfer on death deed,
can be established only by a writing evidencing the contract signed by the
transferor after January 1, 2013.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 19.
January 1, 2013